Wisconsin, session 2025, AB264.
do enact as follows:AB264,11Section 1. 71.07 (6e) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB264,2,5271.07 (6e) (c) 2. No credit may be allowed under this subsection if the 3individual, or the individual’s spouse, files a claim under sub. (3m) or (9) or subch. 4VIII or IX that relates to the same taxable year for which a claim is made under this 5subsection.AB264,26Section 2. Initial applicability.AB264,2,77(1) This act first applies to taxable years beginning on January 1, 2025.AB264,2,88